Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB689.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of April 28, 1937 (P.L.417, No.105), known as the Milk Marketing Law, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103. Definitions; Construction.--The following terms shall be construed in this act to have the following meanings, except in those instances where the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Board-established premium" means a fee or charge established by official order of the board on Class 1 fluid milk.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 312. Collection of Premiums .--(a) The board is hereby vested with the power to coordinate, facilitate or establish the collection and distribution of board-established premiums in accordance with section 801.1.(b) For the purposes of subsection (a), the board shall coordinate with the Department of Revenue and the Department of Revenue shall facilitate the collection of board-established premiums.Section 801.1. Board-Established Premiums.--(a) The board may fix, by official order, a board-established premium based on evidence presented on cost of production, price received and return on equity.20250SB0689PN0668 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 (b) The board shall submit an official order under subsection (a) and section 1104(b) to the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate and the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives for review based on the criteria specified under subsection (a) and section 1104(b).(c) The Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate shall, within thirty calendar days or six legislative session days, whichever is later, from receipt of an official order under subsection (b) notify the board that the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate has approved or disapproved the official order. The Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives shall, within thirty calendar days or six legislative session days, whichever is later, from receipt of an official order under subsection (b) notify the board that the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives has approved or disapproved the official order. If the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate or the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives do not notify the board of a disapproval of the official order by the deadline specified under this subsection, the official order shall be deemed approved. As used in this subsection, the term "legislative session day" means any day when the Senate or the House of Representatives is in session.(d) The board shall transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin notice of an official order approved or deemed approved under subsection (c). A board-established premium shall take effect upon publication in the Pennsylvania 20250SB0689PN0668 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bulletin.(e) An official order under subsection (a) shall be exempt from the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."(2) Article II of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the "Commonwealth Attorneys Act."(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act."Section 3. Sections 809, 1101 and 1104 of the act are amended to read:Section 809. Cooperatives.--(a) It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that no provision of this act shall prevent, and no provision contained herein shall be deemed or construed to prevent, any cooperative agricultural association or corporation organized under the laws of this Commonwealth, or a similar association or corporation organized under the laws of this or any other state, and engaged in making collective sales or in the marketing of milk for the producers thereof, from blending the net proceeds of its sales or consignments or deliveries in all its markets or of its sales or deliveries within any particular market in various classes and whether in fluid form or as manufactured products, both within and without the Commonwealth, and paying its producers such blended price, with such deductions and differentials as may be authorized under contract between such association or corporation, and its producers, and with prior written approval of the board, or from making collective sales of the milk of its members and other 20250SB0689PN0668 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 producers represented by it, or from making such sales or deliveries at a blended price based upon sales or deliveries thereof in the various classes, and whether in fluid form or as manufactured products, both within and without the Commonwealth, which price is to be paid either directly to the producers or to the cooperative agricultural association or corporation. Nothing herein contained shall prevent any milk dealer or handler from contracting for his milk with such cooperative agricultural association or corporation, upon such basis; but all such contracts shall be upon the basis of the prices fixed by the board, with the result that the net price received for milk by such cooperative association or corporation shall be commensurate with such prices. No director or officer of a cooperative association or corporation shall offer, nor shall milk dealers or handlers, or agents thereof, receive from any producer or from such cooperative association or corporation, directly or indirectly, any discounts, rebates, free service, or compensation through rentals, extension of credit, or otherwise for the purpose or with the effect, of reducing the net cost to the dealer or handler for milk purchased or received by or through such cooperative association or corporation.(b) No provision of this act shall be deemed or construed to affect the contracts of such cooperative agricultural association or corporation with its producers, except as hereinafter specifically provided, nor to affect or abridge the rights and powers of such an association or any of its operations: Provided, however, That the powers of subpoena, entry, and inspection, vested in the board under this act, shall apply for the purpose of examining and auditing books and records of any such cooperative agricultural association or 20250SB0689PN0668 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation, at reasonable intervals, for the purpose of administering this act. This section shall not, however, be construed to exempt such association or corporation from the jurisdiction of the board over [the] any of the following:(1) The prices at which it may sell milk to milk dealers or handlers, stores or consumers.(2) The collection of board-established premiums under section 312.(3) The distribution of moneys under section 1104.(4) The provisions of section 1107.(c) Every cooperative agricultural association or corporation operating under the provisions of this section shall file with the board a copy of its certificate of incorporation and by-laws, and a copy of each form of contract employed in its relations with producers, within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act.Section 1101. Milk Marketing Fund.--(a) All moneys collected or received by the board, arising from license fees, penalties, permits or any other source, shall be paid by the board into the State Treasury through the Department of Revenue, and shall, by the State Treasurer, be placed in a separate fund to be known as the "Milk Marketing Fund." Fines imposed under this act shall be payable to, and collected by, the board, and similarly placed in the Milk Marketing Fund.(b) Moneys collected or received by the board, that are not funds of the Commonwealth, but are due to producers, dealers or handlers for, or on account of, milk acquired or received by dealers or handlers from producers or other dealers or handlers, and placed in the Milk Marketing Fund, shall be paid to the persons entitled thereto by the State Treasurer, as directed by 20250SB0689PN0668 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board.(c) Except for moneys described under subsection (b), the board may direct the State Treasurer to transfer excess moneys in the Milk Marketing Fund to the General Fund.Section 1104. Payment.--(a) Moneys in the Milk Marketing Fund appropriated to the board shall be paid out upon warrant of the State Treasurer drawn after requisition by the secretary of the board.(b) Moneys transferred from the General Fund to the Milk Marketing Fund shall, by official order of the board, be distributed by the board to producers, dealers or handlers in a manner that accounts for cost of production, price received and return on equity.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1107. Audits. -- Moneys distributed to producers, dealers or handlers under section 1104(b) shall be subject to an audit by the board or its designee. The board or its designee shall conduct an audit under this section within six months of the first distributions under section 1104(b) and annually thereafter . Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0689PN0668 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021